Arkansas, session 2025, HB1556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas musicians are important to the cultural history of
the state;
(2) Arkansas musicians have made and continue to make important
contributions to music in this state and beyond and deserve recognition; and
(3) Arkansas Music Appreciation Day should be celebrated in the
state by encouraging Arkansas musicians to come to the State Capitol Building
each March 1 to increase public appreciation of Arkansas's contributions to
music by playing music in the State Capitol Building rotunda.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 1-5-117(b), concerning Arkansas Music
Appreciation Day, is amended to read as follows:
(b) September March 1 of each year shall be known as “Arkansas Music
Appreciation Day” to honor the contributions of Arkansas musicians.
*JLL236*
02/21/2025 11:30:46 AM JLL236

HB1556

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 1-5-117(d), concerning Arkansas Music
Appreciation Day, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Each year before September March 1, the Governor shall issue a
proclamation proclaiming September March 1 as Arkansas Music Appreciation Day
and in the proclamation shall:
(1) Comment on the significance of the contributions that
Arkansas musicians have made to the nation's music; and
(2) Call upon the citizens of the state to observe Arkansas
Music Appreciation Day.


























02/21/2025 11:30:46 AM JLL236